South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S880.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  If a member of the General Assembly submits an irrevocable resignation pursuant to Section 8-1-145 on or before March 1, 2026, then the election to fill the vacancy shall be conducted concurrently with the candidacy filing and election schedule applicable to the 2026 election for members of the House of Representatives. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----